West Virginia, session 2026, HB4728.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 6. Speed restrictions. §17C-6-12. Traveling more than 10 miles below the speed limit. In the event that a driver is operating a vehicle more than 10 miles below the posted speed limit on any interstate or state highway, the hazard lights must on.